Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,131
Sale of real estate; notice.

At least thirty days' notice of the terms of sale, with description of property to be sold, shall be given by publication in some newspaper published in the county in which the office of the board of directors is located, or if no newspaper is published in the county then by posting in at least four public places within such district.

Laws 1921, c. 257, § 4, p. 871;

C.S.1922, § 2936;

C.S.1929, § 46-194;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,131.